California, session 20252026, AB1544.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 124 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:124. (a) Except as provided in Section 214 of the Family Code or any other law, the sittings of every court shall be public.(b) (1) The court shall not exclude the public from physical access because remote access is available, unless it is necessary to restrict or limit physical access to protect the health or safety of the public or court personnel.(2) When a courthouse is physically closed, to the extent permitted by law, the court shall provide, at a minimum, a public audio stream or telephonic means by which to listen to the proceedings. This paragraph does not apply to proceedings pursuant to Section 214 of the Family Code or other law that authorizes or requires a proceeding to be closed.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “remote access” shall include, but is not limited to, an audio stream that is available on an internet website or telephonic means to listen to a court proceeding.(c) (1) A judicial officer, peace officer, or other law enforcement officer shall not prohibit a duly authorized representative of a news service, online news service, newspaper, radio or television station, network, news publisher, or court observer a member of the press or public from entering a courtroom, court facility, or other location where a court proceeding that is open to the public is being conducted except as necessary for the court to maintain order and manage proceedings pursuant to Section 128. 128 or any other applicable statute or rule of court.(2)This subdivision does not exempt a person from complying with a rule or order of the court. (3)(2) A violation of this subdivision may be subject to civil penalties pursuant to an action under Section 52.1 of the Civil Code.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, restrict, or reduce any right of access provided by law.